Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2746.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Study committee on trade offices; membership; duties; report; delayed repeal A. The study committee on trade offices is established consisting of the following members: 1. The chairperson of the house of representatives international trade committee, or its successor committee, or the chairperson's designee, who shall serve as the chairperson. 2. The ranking minority party member of the house of representatives international trade committee, or its successor committee, or the ranking member's designee. 3. The chairperson of the house of representatives commerce committee, or its successor committee, or the chairperson's designee. 4. The ranking minority party member of the house of representatives commerce committee, or its successor committee, or the ranking member's designee. 5. The chairperson of the house of representatives government committee, or its successor committee, or the chairperson's designee. 6. The ranking minority party member of the house of representatives government committee, or its successor committee, or the ranking member's designee. 7. The chairperson of the house of representatives appropriations committee, or its successor committee, or the chairperson's designee. 8. The ranking minority party member of the house of representatives appropriations committee, or its successor committee, or the ranking member's designee. 9. Two members of the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. B. The study committee shall: 1. Meet as the study committee deems necessary. 2. Review and oversee all of the trade offices in this state under the authority of the Arizona commerce authority. 3. Examine ways to improve the trade offices in this state. 4. Solicit input and testimony from stakeholders regarding trade offices in this state. 5. Develop findings and recommendations regarding the effectiveness of the trade offices in this state. 6. On or before December 31, 2028, submit a report of the committee's findings and recommendations to the speaker of the house of representatives. C. Committee members are not eligible to receive compensation. D. This section is repealed from and after September 30, 2029.